Idaho, session 2026, S1320.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-1021C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-1021A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1021A. BUSINESS INFORMATION INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT. (1) Notwith-
standing any laws to the contrary, the state controller shall engage in a
project to modernize and replace the state's aging business information in-
frastructure, including its financial, payroll, human capital management,
budget and procurement systems. The purpose of the project shall be to mod-
ernize the state's business information infrastructure and to consolidate
duplicative business systems into a centralized enterprise resource plan-
ning system in order to achieve standardized business practices and greater
transparency in the state's data.
(2) The cost of modernizing the state's business information infra-
structure shall be equitably distributed among and between all state and
public entities that use the services and functions outlined in subsection
(1) of this section. On or before June 30 of each year from the effective
date of this act until and including June 30, 2023, all moneys deposited to
the indirect cost recovery fund resulting from the assessment of the amounts
allocated in the annual statewide indirect cost allocation plan pursuant
to section 67-3531, Idaho Code, shall be transferred to the business infor-
mation infrastructure fund established in section 67-1021C, Idaho Code.
Transfers under this section shall occur as requested by the state con-
troller and no later than June 30 of each year.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.